Utah statutes.
19-2-109.   Air quality standards -- Hearings on adoption -- Orders of
executive secretary -- Adoption of emission control requirements.
(1) (a)  The board, in adopting standards of quality for ambient air, shall
conduct public hearings.
(b)  Notice of any public hearing for the consideration, adoption, or
amendment of air quality standards shall specify the locations to which the
proposed standards apply and the time, date, and place of  the hearing.
(c)  The notice shall be:
(i) (A)  published at least twice in any newspaper of general circulation in
the area affected; and
(B)  published, in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least 20 days before
the public hearing; and
(ii)  mailed at least 20 days before the public hearing to the chief executive
of each political subdivision of the area affected and to other persons the
executive secretary has reason to believe will be affected by the standards.
(d)  The adoption of air quality standards or any modification or changes to
air quality standards shall be by order of the executive secretary following
formal action of the board with respect to the standards.
(e)  The order shall be published:
(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(2) (a)  The board may establish emission control requirements by rule that in
its judgment may be necessary to prevent, abate, or control air pollution that
may be statewide or may vary from area to area, taking into account varying
local conditions.
(b)  In adopting these requirements, the board shall give notice and conduct
public hearings in accordance with the requirements in Subsection (1).
